Illinois, session 104th, HB2232.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Arthritis Prevention, Control, and Cure Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 2/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Arthritis Prevention, Control, and Cure Act. 9(Source: P.A. 94-634, eff. 1-1-06.)